Maryland, session 2025, HB0598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–303.
(b) (8) (I) 1. IN THIS PARAGRAPH THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
2. “ELIGIBLE CONSTRUCTION” MEANS CONSTRUCTION
OF A NEW SUPERMARKET OR ANY SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION OF AN EXISTING
SUPERMARKET.
3. “SUPERMARKET” MEANS A GROCERY STORE THAT
HAS:
A. ALL MAJOR FOOD DEPARTMENTS, INCLUDING
PRODUCE, MEAT, SEAFOOD, DAIRY, AND CANNED AND PACKAGED GOODS;
B. MORE THAN 50% OF TOTAL SALES DERIVED FROM
FOOD SALES; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 177 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
C. MORE THAN 50% OF TOTAL FLOOR SPACE DEDICATED
TO FOOD SALES.
(II) THE GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF
A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY LAW, A
PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AGAINST THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON PERSONAL
PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED BY A SUPERMARKET THAT:
1. COMPLETES ELIGIBLE CONSTRUCTION; AND
2. IS LOCATED IN A FOOD DESERT RETAIL INCENTIVE
AREA.
(III) THE GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF
A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY SHALL, BY LAW,
DESIGNATE WHAT CONSTITUTES A FOOD DESERT RETAIL INCENTIVE AREA FOR
PURPOSES OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(IV) A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT GRANTED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH FOR A TAXABLE YEAR MAY NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF PROPERTY
TAX IMPOSED ON THE PERSONAL PROPERTY OF A SUPERMARKET IN THAT YEAR.
(V) THE GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF
A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH, BY LAW:
1. LIMITS ON THE CUMULATIVE AMOUNT OF PROPERTY
TAX CREDITS GRANTED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH;
2. ADDITIONAL LIMITATIONS ON THE AMOUNT OF THE
CREDIT;
3. ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR
SUPERMARKETS TO QUALIFY FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH;
4. ADDITIONAL CRITERIA FOR WHAT CONSTITUTES
ELIGIBLE CONSTRUCTION THAT MAY QUALIFY A SUPERMARKET FOR THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
5. ANY OTHER PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THIS PARAGRAPH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 177
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –